District of Columbia statutes.
9-1111.17

Funding of facilities for the handicapped.

The Secretary of Transportation is authorized to make payments to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority in amounts sufficient to finance 80 per centum of the cost of providing such facilities for the subway and rapid rail transit system authorized in this subchapter as may be necessary to make such subway and system accessible by the handicapped through implementation of Public Laws 90-480 and 91-205 (Chapter 51 of Title 42, United States Code). There is authorized to be appropriated, to carry out this section, an amount not to exceed $65,000,000.

History

Aug. 13, 1973, 87 Stat. 271, Pub. L. 93-87, title I, § 140

Cross References

Blind and physically disabled persons, equal access to public conveyances and accommodations, see § 7-1002.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2453.
1973 Ed., § 1-1442a.